apertium-fra.fra.metadix
<pardef n="cou/dre__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>drions</l>    <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>drais</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>driez</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>drais</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>draient</l>   <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>drait</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>drons</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>drai</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>drez</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dras</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dront</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dra</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sant</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sîmes</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sis</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sîtes</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sis</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sirent</l>    <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sit</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sons</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sons</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sez</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sez</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ds</l>        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ds</l>        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dre</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sions</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sais</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siez</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sais</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>saient</l>    <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sait</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sissions</l>  <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sisse</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sissiez</l>   <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sisses</l>    <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sissent</l>   <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sît</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sues</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sue</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sus</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>su</l>        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sons</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ds</l>        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sez</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ds</l>        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sent</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sions</l>     <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siez</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sent</l>      <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>dre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="coudre"><i>cou</i><par n="cou/dre__vblex"/></e>
